Tennessee, session 114, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Less is More Act of 2025."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1304(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (4).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-10-103(a), is amended by deleting
all language before the colon and substituting:
The commission is composed of the following twenty-five (25) members:
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-10-103(d), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(d)
(1) Members are appointed for a term of four (4) years and may be
subsequently appointed to additional four-year terms. Terms begin on July 1 and
end on June 30 of the appropriate years. For members of the general assembly
who serve on the commission, appointments and reappointments must be
consistent with terms of office for the senate and the house of representatives.
(2) If any member ceases to be an officer, member, or employee of the
unit, body, or agency the member is appointed to represent, such member’s
membership on the commission terminates immediately. Any position that
HB1330
002823
- 1 -

becomes vacant prior to the expiration of a full term must be filled only for the
period of the unexpired term.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a)(39), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-51-103(f), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" wherever it appears and substituting "ninety (90) days".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-108, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Electronic means of communication" means real-time communication
by video conference or audio conference and may include the use of an internet-
based platform but does not include email;
(2) "Governing body" means the governing body of a board, agency, or
commission of state government; and
(3) "Meeting" has the same definition as in § 8-44-102.
(b) A governing body may, but is not required to, allow participation by electronic
means of communication for any meeting authorized by law for the benefit of the public
or members of the governing body. A meeting of a governing body conducted with a
member or members participating by electronic means of communication must comply
with this section.
(c) If a meeting will be conducted with participation by a member or members of
a governing body by electronic means of communication, then the governing body shall:
(1) Allow members of the public to:
(A) View and listen to the meeting by electronic means in real
time if the meeting is conducted using video conference, or listen to the
- 2 - 002823

meeting by electronic means in real time if the meeting is conducted
using audio conference with no video; and
(B) Participate or provide comment by electronic means of
communication, or by providing written comment through the use of an
internet-based platform, if participation or public comment would normally
be allowed at the meeting;
(2) Publish a notice and agenda as required by this part or other law that:
(A) States that the meeting will include members of the governing
body participating by electronic means of communication;
(B) Specifies a physical location where members of the public
may attend the meeting;
(C) Contains information necessary for members of the public to
access the meeting by electronic means of communication to view or
listen; and
(D) Contains instructions on how to provide public comment as
described in subdivision (c)(1)(B), which may include contacting the
governing body or registering in advance to receive information enabling
a person to provide public comment. This subdivision (c)(2)(D) does not
require a governing body to allow public comment as part of its meetings
or alter its rules for public comment or public participation in a meeting;
(3) Make a recording of the meeting, and post the recording or a link to
the recording on the governing body's website. The governing body shall post
the recording or link to the recording as soon as possible but no later than three
(3) business days after the meeting. The governing body shall continue to
publish on its website the recording or link to the recording for at least one (1)
- 3 - 002823

year, and shall retain the recording or link for at least three (3) years after the
recording was created;
(4) Ensure that each part of a meeting required to be open to the public
is audible to the public at the physical location specified in the notice of the
meeting. Each member participating by electronic means of communication
must be able to simultaneously hear each other and speak to each other during
the meeting. A member participating by electronic means of communication shall
identify the persons present in the room from which the member is participating;
(5) Prior to the meeting, provide to a member of a governing body
participating by electronic means the same documents that will be discussed at
the meeting with substantially the same content as those documents actually
presented to members physically present; and
(6) Take a roll call vote for all votes taken during a meeting held pursuant
to this subsection (c).
(d) A governing body shall meet with a quorum physically present no less than
once per calendar year. If more than two (2) consecutive calendar years elapse without
a governing body meeting with a quorum physically present, then the governing body
shall report to the chairs of the government operations committee of the senate and the
committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters
pertaining to government operations that a physical quorum has not occurred in more
than two (2) consecutive calendar years. The report must include the name of the
governing body, the dates on which the governing body met with members participating
by electronic means of communication, and the circumstances that prevented the
governing body from meeting with a quorum physically present during that time period.
- 4 - 002823

(e) This section does not prohibit a governing body from complying with § 8-44-
109.
(f) Any meeting held pursuant to this section must comply with the requirements
of the open meetings law, compiled in this part, and must not circumvent the spirit or
requirements of that law.
(g) A member of a governing body participating in a meeting by electronic
means of communication is considered physically present at the meeting for purposes of
voting and for purposes of establishing a quorum. A member of a governing body
participating in a meeting by electronic means of communication is not considered
physically present for purposes of receiving compensation, whether denominated per
diem or whatever name called, if the eligibility for compensation depends upon the
member's physical presence at the meeting. However, a member may be reimbursed
the expenses of such electronic communication or other means of participation.
(h) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, § 4-5-312(c) controls electronic
participation in contested case hearings pursuant to the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3; provided, however, that this section
applies to meetings held to take summary action pursuant to § 4-5-320(c) and to review
summary action pursuant to § 4-5-320(d)(2).
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-601(b), is amended by deleting
the first sentence of the subsection and substituting:
The general assembly finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to promote the
skill, art, and practice of court reporting in order to assure that court reporters possess
the necessary skills and qualifications and that the commissioner of commerce and
insurance shall prescribe the qualifications of court reporters and issue licenses to
persons who demonstrate their ability and fitness for the licenses.
- 5 - 002823

SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-602(1), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of commerce and insurance, or
the commissioner's designee;
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-602(3), is amended by
deleting "Tennessee board of court reporting" and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-604, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-605, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
The commissioner has the duty and responsibility to:
(1) Act on matters concerning competency for licensure only and the
process of granting, suspending, reinstating, and revoking a license;
(2) Establish and maintain requirements for the ethical behavior of court
reporters, including, but not limited to, conflict of interest provisions, inappropriate
relationships with a party or a party's attorney, and failure to honor a contract or
commitment to furnish transcripts;
(3) Establish a procedure for the investigation of complaints against
licensed court reporters;
(4) Set a fee schedule for granting licenses and renewals of licenses;
(5) Maintain a current registry of licensed court reporters and a current
registry of temporarily licensed court reporters, both of which are matters of
public record;
(6) Adopt continuing education requirements for court reporters;
- 6 - 002823

(7) Determine the content of and administer examinations to be given to
applicants for licensure as licensed court reporters and issue numbered licenses
to applicants found qualified;
(8) Maintain records of proceedings and a registry of all persons licensed
by the commissioner, which must be a public record and open to inspection; and
(9) In the event funds are available from fees after expenses, study and,
if feasible, establish the transcript reimbursement fund to assist indigent parties
in obtaining transcripts.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-606(a), is amended by
deleting "chair of the board" and substituting "commissioner", and by deleting the language
"board" wherever it appears and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-606(b), is amended by
deleting "The board may, when it deems appropriate," and substituting "The commissioner may,
when the commissioner deems appropriate,".
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-607, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting instead:
(a) The commissioner shall promulgate rules necessary to implement,
administer, and otherwise effectuate this part. All rules must be promulgated in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter
5. The rules must be published in the standards of professional practice and made
available to all licensees.
(b) Current rules, decisions, and policies issued or promulgated by the board of
court reporting prior to July 1, 2025, remain in full force and effect and must be
administered and enforced by the commissioner, unless otherwise modified or repealed.
- 7 - 002823

SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-608, is amended by deleting
"board" and substituting "commissioner", and by deleting "fine" and substituting instead
"penalty".
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-609(a), is amended by
deleting "board" and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-610, is amended by deleting
"board" wherever it appears and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-611, is amended deleting
"board of court reporting fund" in the third sentence and substituting "Tennessee court reporting
fund", and by deleting "board" wherever it appears and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-612, is amended by deleting
the language "board" wherever it appears and substituting instead "commissioner".
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-613, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-614, is amended by deleting
"board" wherever it appears and substituting "commissioner", and by deleting "board-approved"
and substituting "commissioner-approved".
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-615, is amended by deleting
"board" and substituting "commissioner".
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-616, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) All moneys collected pursuant to this part must be deposited in the state
treasury in a separate fund to be known as the Tennessee court reporting fund.
(b) Disbursements from this fund must be made solely for the purpose of
defraying expenses incurred in the implementation and enforcement of this part.
- 8 - 002823

(c) Such expenses must not be payable from the general fund of the state.
(d) Any part of the Tennessee court reporting fund remaining at the end of a
fiscal year must not revert to the general fund of the state but must be carried forward
until expended in accordance with this part.
(e) The commissioner shall budget annually, in advance, expenditures for
programs, services, allocated overhead or chargebacks, and other normal operating
expenses as determined by the commissioner. These expenditures must be budgeted
at the beginning of the fiscal year and must not exceed the fees to be received by the
commissioner, including the excesses accumulated in the Tennessee court reporting
fund. The commissioner of finance and administration shall inform the commissioner
annually, in advance for budgeting purposes, of the allocation of all overhead or
chargebacks.
(f) Subject to approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of
finance and administration, the commissioner may also contract for services to carry out
this part.
(g) As of July 1, 2025, the Tennessee board of court reporting fund must be
renamed the Tennessee court reporting fund, and all funds in the Tennessee board of
court reporting fund must remain in the Tennessee court reporting fund.
SECTION 25. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-2-403(b), is amended by adding
the following subdivision:
(10) Facilities that are operated for the provision of the Employment and
Community First CHOICES program and services, as provided in title 71, chapter 5, or
Tenn. Comp. R. & Regs. 1200-13, for comprehensive behavioral supports for
employment and community living for adults with intellectual or developmental
disabilities and severe behavioral or psychiatric conditions or any successor program,
- 9 - 002823

service, or a home and community-based services waiver approved by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services pursuant to § 1915(c) of the Social Security Act.
SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-102, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(e) Following the expiration of terms for members appointed prior to July 1,
2025, pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(B)-(G), the terms of office begin on July 1 and
terminate on June 30 of the appropriate years.
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-14-311, is amended by deleting
"Tennessee board of court reporting" and substituting "commissioner of commerce and
insurance".
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-2-403(a), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
The department may license services and facilities operated for the provision of
disability services and for personal support services, and for the provision of the
Employment and Community First CHOICES program and services, as provided in title
71, chapter 5, or Tenn. Comp. R. & Regs. 1200-13, for comprehensive behavioral
supports for employment and community living for adults with intellectual or
developmental disabilities and severe behavioral or psychiatric conditions or any
successor program, service, or a home and community-based services waiver approved
by the centers for medicare & medicaid services pursuant to §1915(c) of the Social
Security Act.
SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-8-102(f)(2), is amended by
inserting the following language after the first sentence:
Effective July 1, 2025, members appointed pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) and
subdivisions (c)(3)-(5) serve three-year terms.
- 10 - 002823

SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-17-103(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "One (1) industry member shall be selected from each of the state’s nine (9)
congressional districts" and substituting instead "Three (3) industry members shall be appointed
from each of the state's three (3) grand divisions".
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-105(e)(7), is amended by
deleting "to implement § 62-1-117".
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-106(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Before an applicant is eligible to receive the certificate described in § 62-1-
107, the applicant must complete:
(A) At least one hundred fifty (150) semester hours of college education,
including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university
acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an accounting
concentration or equivalent as determined by board rule to be appropriate; or
(B) At least one hundred twenty (120) semester hours of college
education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or
university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an
accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by board rule to be
appropriate.
SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-106(c)(2), is amended by
deleting "candidate" and substituting "applicant".
SECTION 34. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-106(d), is amended by
deleting the phrase "business law and taxation" and substituting "taxation and regulation" and
by deleting "grading papers and".
- 11 - 002823

SECTION 35. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-106(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(f) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate under this section shall show
that the applicant has had experience to include providing a type of service or advice
involving the use of accounting, attest, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or
consulting skills, as verified by a licensee. The applicant must have gained the
experience through employment in government, industry, academia, or public practice.
The applicant must have the following experience:
(1) One (1) year of experience if the applicant is applying for a certificate
based on the education described in subdivision (c)(1)(A); or
(2) Two (2) years of experience if the applicant is applying for a
certificate based on the education described in subdivision (c)(1)(B).
SECTION 36. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-107(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) The board shall grant or renew certificates to persons who make application
and demonstrate that their qualifications, including, where applicable, the qualifications
prescribed by § 62-1-106, are in accordance with subsections (b)-(i);
SECTION 37. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-107(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) With regard to applicants who are licensees of another state, the board shall
issue a certificate upon a showing that the applicant holds a license in good standing in
another jurisdiction in the United States and at the time the individual was licensed in
another state, the individual showed evidence of having successfully completed the
uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination.
- 12 - 002823

SECTION 38. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-1-117, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
62-1-117. Mobility.
(a) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state but who
has a valid license in good standing as a certified public accountant from another state
must be granted practice privileges in this state, if at the time the individual was licensed,
the individual showed evidence of having successfully completed the Uniform Certified
Public Accountant Examination. A notice, fee, or other submission must not be required
from the individual. The individual is subject to the requirements in subsection (b).
(b) An individual licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under
this section and the certified public accountant (CPA) firm that employs the licensee, as
a condition of the grant of this privilege, simultaneously consent to the following:
(1) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary
authority of the board;
(2) To comply with this chapter and the board's rules;
(3) That in the event the license from the state of the individual's principal
place of business is no longer valid, the individual shall cease offering or
rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a CPA
firm; and
(4) To the appointment of the state board that issued the license as the
agent upon whom process may be served in the action or proceeding by this
board against the licensee.
(c) A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using the licensee's
CPA title in another state is subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act
committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an
- 13 - 002823

act committed in the other state. The board is required to investigate any complaint
made by the board of accountancy of another state.
SECTION 39. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-3-101(b), is amended by
deleting "Annual inspections" and substituting "Inspections".
SECTION 40. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-3-115(a), is amended by
deleting "a nonresident" and substituting "an applicant" and by deleting "nonresident" and
substituting "applicant".
SECTION 41. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-3-128(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(e) Each barber school, college, or shop may be inspected as determined by the
board to be necessary to carry out this chapter.
SECTION 42. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-103(b)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (C), (D), and (E) and substituting:
(C) One (1) manicurist or one (1) cosmetologist who practices manicuring;
(D) One (1) aesthetician or one (1) cosmetologist who practices aesthetics;
(E) One (1) natural hair stylist or one (1) cosmetologist who practices natural
hair styling;
SECTION 43. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-118(i), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(i) The board shall promulgate rules regarding the frequency of subsequent
inspections of shops after the initial inspection pursuant to § 62-4-118(f).
SECTION 44. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-4-120(h), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(h) The board shall promulgate rules regarding the frequency of subsequent
inspections of schools after the initial inspection pursuant to § 62-4-120(d).
- 14 - 002823

SECTION 45. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-5-201, is amended by deleting
subsections (b), (c), and (d) and substituting:
(b) Each person appointed to the board by the governor serves as a member of
the board for a period of four (4) years or until a successor is appointed and qualified.
Terms begin on January 1st and terminate on December 31st.
(c) Vacancies occurring on the board must be filled in accordance with this
section for the balance of the unexpired term.
SECTION 46. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-109(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection.
SECTION 47. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-206(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 48. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-303(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(d) Each applicant who passes the examination shall submit an application for
the appropriate license to the commission. If the application is not filed within two (2)
years of the date the applicant passed the examination, the applicant must retake and
pass the examination in order to be eligible for a license. The commission may, at its
discretion, waive this requirement.
SECTION 49. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-318(d)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) Either:
(A) Submission of proof of completion of all classroom hours in real
estate courses that would have been required under § 62-13-303 if the licensee
had instead maintained an active license during the period of temporary
retirement; or
- 15 - 002823

(B) Submission of proof of completion of a commission-approved course
consisting of thirty (30) hours of continuing education.
SECTION 50. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-319(a), is amended by
inserting the language ", not to exceed twelve months" immediately following "one hundred
dollars ($100) per month" in the first sentence, and by inserting the language ", not to exceed
twelve months" immediately following "from the time the license expired" in subdivision (a)(2).
SECTION 51. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-319, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (c):
(c) A licensee in good standing with the commission, whose license has been
expired for more than two (2) years but has not been temporarily retired under § 62-13-
318, may reactivate the license upon:
(1) Payment of the penalty in subsection (a); and
(2) Completion of a commission-approved course consisting of thirty (30)
hours of continuing education.
SECTION 52. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 18, Part 2, is amended by
deleting the part.
SECTION 53. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-36-114(5), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(5) Receive, administer, and account for all monies derived under this chapter
and transfer these funds to the state treasurer, who shall keep the moneys in a fund to
be known as the "geologist regulatory fund." The fund must be used to defray expenses
incurred in carrying out this chapter. As of July 1, 2025, the geologist and soil scientist
regulatory fund must be renamed the geologist regulatory fund, and all funds in the
geologist and soil scientist regulatory fund must remain in the geologist regulatory fund.
- 16 - 002823

Moneys deposited in the fund must not revert to the general fund and must be carried
forward into each subsequent fiscal year;
SECTION 54. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 76, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A regulatory authority may enter into reciprocal agreements with appropriate
officials in other jurisdictions to grant licenses to persons or entities licensed in the other
jurisdictions who possess sufficient qualifications as established by the regulatory
authority to operate across state lines under mutually acceptable terms.
(b) Each regulatory authority may promulgate rules to carry out this section. All
rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures
Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Regulatory authority" means any board-run, commission-run, or
commissioner-run program in the division of regulatory boards of the department
of commerce and insurance that issues a license; and
(2) "License" means a license, certificate, or registration for an individual
or entity to engage in an occupation, profession, business, or trade in this state.
SECTION 55. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-103(c), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
Effective July 1, 2025, all members are appointed for five-year terms.
SECTION 56. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-103(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the second and third sentences and substituting "In the event of a vacancy on the
board, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve out the balance of the unexpired term.
A member may be reappointed to serve a successive term.".
- 17 - 002823

SECTION 57. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-102(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a new
member to serve out the balance of the unexpired term.
SECTION 58. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-8-105(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) A member shall continue to serve until that member's successor is appointed.
In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a new member to
serve out the balance of the unexpired term.
SECTION 59. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-14-101(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the last sentence and substituting "In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor
shall appoint a new member to serve out the balance of the unexpired term.".
SECTION 60. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-27-103(e), is amended by
deleting the third sentence and substituting "In the event of a vacancy on the board, the
governor shall appoint a new member to serve out the balance of the unexpired term.".
SECTION 61. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-115-103, is amended by deleting
subsection (b).
SECTION 62. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-115-103(h), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(h) A member of the commission whose appointment has expired may be
appointed to subsequent terms pursuant to this section and § 68-115-104.
SECTION 63. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-1-201, is amended by deleting
subsections (b) and (c) and substituting:
(b)
- 18 - 002823

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (b), each member
must be confirmed by the committee of the house of representatives with
jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to agriculture and natural resources;
by the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate; and by
joint resolution of the general assembly prior to beginning a term of office.
(2) Members' terms begin July 1 and expire on June 30 of the
appropriate years. Members serving on February 28, 2026, shall continue to
serve until June 30, 2026.
(3) If the general assembly is not in session at the time a member is
appointed to fill a vacancy resulting from the expiration of a term, then the
member of the commission shall serve until a new appointee is confirmed as
provided in subdivision (b)(1).
(4) If the general assembly is not in session at the time a member is
appointed to fill a vacancy not resulting from the expiration of a term, then the
new appointee shall serve for the term appointed unless such appointment is not
confirmed within sixty (60) calendar days after the general assembly next
convenes in regular session following such appointment.
(c)
(1) Each regular term of a commission member appointed by a speaker
is four (4) years and each regular term of a commission member appointed by
the governor is six (6) years.
(2) A commission member shall not serve consecutive terms. For the
purposes of this subdivision (c)(2), a commission member is considered as
having served a term if such member has served more than two (2) years of an
initial term, a regular term, or an unexpired term.
- 19 - 002823

(3) A vacancy on the commission must be filled by the appointing
authority making the original appointment for the remainder of any unexpired
term or, if a term has expired, for a regular term.
SECTION 64. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 65. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect on
July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 20 - 002823